en: Target resetting mechanism: Auto-reset (electronic); Auto-reset (spring); Knockover (manual reset); Reactive spinner; Self-resetting (mechanical); Static (no reset); Other
de: Rückstellmechanismus des Ziels: Automatischer Reset (elektronisch); Automatische Rückstellung (Feder); Umkippbar (manuelle Rückstellung); Reaktives Drehzil; Selbstrückstellend (mechanisch); Statisch (keine Rückstellung); Sonstige
el: Μηχανισμός επαναφοράς στόχου: Αυτόματη επαναφορά (ηλεκτρονική); Αυτόματη επαναφορά (με ελατήριο); Ανατρεπόμενος (χειροκίνητη επαναφορά); Περιστρεφόμενος αντιδραστικός στόχος; Αυτοεπαναφερόμενος (μηχανικός); Στατικός (χωρίς επαναφορά); Άλλο
pt-BR: Alvo mecanismo de retorno: Redefinição automática (eletrônica); Redefinição automática (mola); Derrubável (redefinição manual); Giratório reativo; Autorredefinível (mecânica); Estático (sem redefinição); Outro
da: Nulstillingsmekanisme for mål: Automatisk nulstilling (elektronisk); Automatisk nulstilling (fjeder); Væltemål (manuel nulstilling); Reaktiv spinner; Selvnulstillende (mekanisk); Statisk (ingen nulstilling); Andet
pl: Mechanizm przywracania pozycji tarczy: Automatyczny reset (elektroniczny); Automatyczny reset (sprężynowy); Przewracany (reset ręczny); Cel obrotowy; Samoresetujący (mechaniczny); Statyczny (bez resetu); Inny
tr: Hedef sıfırlama mekanizması: Otomatik sıfırlama (elektronik); Otomatik sıfırlama (yaylı); Devrilme (manuel sıfırlama); Tepkisel döner hedef; Kendiliğinden sıfırlama (mekanik); Statik (sıfırlama yok); Diğer
sv: Mekanism för återställning av mål: Automatisk återställning (elektronisk); Automatisk återställning (fjäder); Fällbar (manuell återställning); Reaktiv snurra; Självåterställande (mekanisk); Statisk (ingen återställning); Annat
cs: Mechanismus obnovení terče: Automatický reset (elektronický); Automatický reset (pružinový); Sklopné (ruční reset); Reaktivní terč (spinner); Samoobnovovací (mechanické); Statické (bez resetu); Jiné
pt-PT: Mecanismo de reposição do alvo: Reposição automática (eletrónica); Reposição automática (mola); Derrubável (reposição manual); Alvo rotativo reativo; Reposição automática (mecânica); Estático (sem reposição); Outro
zh-CN: 靶标复位机制: 自动重置（电子）; 自动重置（弹簧）; 击倒（手动重置）; 反应旋转靶; 自动重置（机械）; 静态（不重置）; 其他
th: กลไกการรีเซ็ตเป้าหมาย: รีเซ็ตอัตโนมัติ (อิเล็กทรอนิกส์); รีเซ็ตอัตโนมัติ (สปริง); ล้ม (รีเซ็ตด้วยตนเอง); สปินเนอร์แบบตอบสนอง; รีเซ็ตตัวเอง (กลไก); คงที่ (ไม่มีการรีเซ็ต); อื่นๆ
vi: Cơ chế đặt lại mục tiêu: Tự động đặt lại (điện tử); Tự động đặt lại (lò xo); Bắn lật (đặt lại thủ công); Con quay phản ứng; Tự động đặt lại (cơ học); Tĩnh (không đặt lại); Khác
zh-TW: 標靶重置機制: 自動重設 (電子式); 自動重設 (彈簧式); 擊倒式 (手動重設); 反應式旋轉靶; 自動重設 (機械式); 靜態 (不需重設); 其他
ru: Механизм возврата мишени: Автосброс (электронный); Автосброс (пружинный); Падающая (ручной сброс); Вращающаяся мишень (спиннер); Самосбрасывающаяся (механическая); Статическая (без сброса); Другое
lt-LT: Taikinio grąžinimo mechanizmas: Automatinis atstatymas (elektroninis); Automatinis atstatymas (spyruoklinis); Numušamas (rankinis atstatymas); Reaguojantis sukamasis; Savaiminio atstatymo (mechaninis); Statinis (be atstatymo); Kita
nl: Doel resetmechanisme: Automatische reset (elektronisch); Automatische reset (veer); Omklappend (handmatige reset); Reactieve spinner; Zelfresettend (mechanisch); Statisch (geen reset); Overig
ko: 표적 복귀 메커니즘: 자동 리셋(전자식); 자동 리셋(스프링식); 넉오버(수동 리셋); 반응형 스피너; 셀프 리셋(기계식); 고정형(리셋 없음); 기타
fi: Tavoitepalautusmekanismi: Automaattipalautus (elektroninen); Automaattipalautus (jousi); Kaatuva (manuaalinen palautus); Reagoiva spinneri; Itsepalautuva (mekaaninen); Staattinen (ei palautusta); Muu
sk-SK: Mechanizmus resetovania terča: Automatický reset (elektronický); Automatický reset (pružinový); Preklápací (manuálny reset); Reaktívny spinner; Samoresetovací (mechanický); Statický (bez resetu); Iné
ja: ターゲットリセット機構: 自動リセット (電子式); 自動リセット (スプリング式); ノックオーバー (手動リセット); リアクティブスピナー; 自己リセット (機械式); 静的 (リセットなし); その他
hr-HR: Mehanizam za ponovno postavljanje cilja: Automatsko ponovno postavljanje (elektroničko); Automatsko ponovno postavljanje (opruga); Obaranje (ručno ponovno postavljanje); Reaktivna meta (spinner); Samostalno ponovno postavljanje (mehaničko); Statično (bez ponovnog postavljanja); Ostalo
ro-RO: Mecanismul de resetare a țintei: Resetare automată (electronic); Resetare automată (arc); Răsturnare (resetare manuală); Țintă rotativă reactivă; Autoresetare (mecanic); Static (fără resetare); Altele
hu: Céltárgy visszaállítási mechanizmus: Automatikus visszaállás (elektronikus); Automatikus visszaállás (rugós); Ledőlő (kézi visszaállítás); Reaktív forgó cél; Önvisszaállító (mechanikus); Statikus (nem visszaállítható); Egyéb
sl-SI: Mehanizem za ponastavitev tarče: Samodejna ponastavitev (elektronsko); Samodejna ponastavitev (vzmet); Prevrnitev (ročna ponastavitev); Reaktivna vrtljiva tarča; Samoponastavitveno (mehansko); Statično (brez ponastavitve); Drugo
it: Meccanismo di ripristino del bersaglio: Ripristino automatico (elettronico); Ripristino automatico (a molla); A caduta (ripristino manuale); Bersaglio girevole reattivo; Auto-ripristinante (meccanico); Statico (senza ripristino); Altro
bg-BG: Механизъм за връщане на мишената: Автоматично нулиране (електронно); Автоматично нулиране (с пружина); Сваляне (ръчно нулиране); Реактивен спинър; Самовъзстановяващ се (механичен); Статичен (без нулиране); Друго
nb: Mål for tilbakestillmekanisme: Automatisk tilbakestilling (elektronisk); Automatisk tilbakestilling (fjær); Veltemål (manuell tilbakestilling); Reaktiv spinner; Selvtilbakestillende (mekanisk); Statisk (ingen tilbakestilling); Annet
es: Mecanismo de restablecimiento del objetivo: Restablecimiento automático (electrónico); Restablecimiento automático (resorte); Abatible (restablecimiento manual); Blanco giratorio reactivo; Autorrestablecimiento (mecánico); Estático (sin restablecimiento); Otro
fr: Mécanisme de réarmement de la cible: Réinitialisation automatique (électronique); Réinitialisation automatique (ressort); Cible basculante (réinitialisation manuelle); Cible réactive tournante; Auto-réinitialisable (mécanique); Statique (sans réinitialisation); Autre